District of Columbia statutes.
50-1705

Application of chapter.

(a)

This chapter shall apply to any person operating a motor vehicle in the District of Columbia.

(b)

This chapter shall apply to any motor vehicle that is used for personal use.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-194, § 6, 30 DCR 49
Mar. 7, 1992, D.C. Law 9-57, § 2(c), 38 DCR 7283
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-212, § 2(d), 49 DCR 8137

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1205.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-212 designated subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).